Maine, session 132, LD368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend the laws governing cannabis to address concerns about the
health effects of the use of radiation machines and similar equipment used to treat,
decontaminate or remediate cannabis flower and trim and to protect consumers from the
unknowing or unwanted use of products that have been processed using these machines or
equipment.
This bill also proposes to clarify the laws governing testing requirements for adult use
cannabis and cannabis products.
Page 1 - 132LR1390(01)